Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3 Tennessee Sports Gaming Act
4-51-320. Persons prohibited from obtaining licenses.

The following persons shall not apply for or obtain a license:

A member or employee of the council, board, or corporation;

An employee of any professional sports team;

A coach of, or player for, a collegiate, professional, or Olympic sports team or sport;

A person who is a member or employee of any governing body of a sports team, league, or association;

A person who has been convicted of a crime as specified in rules promulgated by the board;

A person having the ability to directly affect the outcome of a sporting event; and

Any other category of persons, established by rule of the board, that if licensed, would affect the integrity of sports wagering in this state.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-321. Transfer of licenses.

The board may adopt rules prescribing the manner in which a license may be transferred and a fee for the transfer of the license.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-322. House rules — Acceptance of wagers — Payouts.

Each licensee shall adopt and adhere to a written, comprehensive policy outlining the house rules governing the acceptance of wagers and payouts. The policy and rules must be approved by the board prior to the acceptance of a wager by a licensee. The policy and rules must be readily available to a bettor on the licensee's website.

The board shall promulgate rules regarding:

The manner in which a licensee accepts wagers from and issues payouts to bettors, including payouts in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

Reporting requirements for suspicious wagers.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-323. Inspections.

Members of the board or designated employees or agents of the corporation may, during normal business hours, enter the premises of any facility of a licensee or third party utilized by the licensee to operate and conduct business in accordance with this part for the purpose of inspecting books and records kept as required by this part, to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with this part, or to make any other inspection of the premises necessary to protect the interests of this state and its consumers.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-324. Licensee reporting requirements — Compliance hearing.

Each licensee shall report to the board, no later than January 15 of each year:

The total amount of wagers received from bettors for the immediately preceding calendar year;

The adjusted gross income of the licensee for the immediately preceding calendar year; and

Any additional information required by rule of the board deemed in the public interest or necessary to maintain the integrity of sports wagering in this state.

A licensee shall immediately report to the board any information relating to:

The name of any newly elected officer or director of the board of the licensed entity; and

The acquisition by any person of five percent (5%) or more of any class of corporate stock.

With respect to information reported under subsection (b), a licensee shall include with the report a statement as to any conflict of interest that may exist as the result of such election or acquisition.

Upon receiving a report under this section or § 4-51-315(b), the board may conduct a hearing in accordance with § 4-51-326 to determine whether the licensee remains in compliance with this part.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-325. Interactive sports wagering.

Prior to placing a wager with a licensee via interactive sports wagering, a bettor shall register with the licensee remotely and attest that the bettor meets the requirements to place a wager with a licensee in this state. Prior to verification of a bettor's identity in accordance with this section, a licensee shall not allow the bettor to engage in sports wagering, make a deposit, or process a withdrawal via interactive sports wagering. A licensee shall implement commercially and technologically reasonable procedures to prevent access to sports wagering by minors on its interactive platforms. A licensee may use information obtained from third parties to verify that a person is authorized to open an account, place wagers, and make deposits and withdrawals.

A licensee shall adopt a registration policy to ensure that all bettors utilizing interactive sports wagering are authorized to place a wager with a licensee within this state. The policy must include, without limitation, a mechanism by which to:

Verify the name and age of the registrant;

Verify that the registrant is not prohibited from placing a wager under § 4-51-312; and

Obtain the following information:

A physical address other than a post office box;

A phone number;

A unique user name; and

An active email account.

A licensee may require a bettor to provide the licensee with a signed and notarized document attesting that the bettor is qualified to engage in sports wagering under this part as part of the registration policy of the licensee.

A bettor shall not register more than one (1) account with a licensee, and a licensee shall use all commercially and technologically reasonable means to ensure that each bettor is limited to one (1) account.

A licensee, in addition to complying with state and federal law pertaining to the protection of the private, personal information of registered bettors, shall use all other commercially and technologically reasonable means to protect such information consistent with industry standards.

Once a bettor account is created, a bettor may only fund the account through:

Electronic bank transfer of funds, including such transfers through third parties;

Debit cards;

Online and mobile payment systems that support online money transfers; and

Any other method approved by the rule of the board that is initiated with cash.

Each financial transaction with respect to an account between a bettor and licensee must be confirmed by email, telephone, text message, or other means agreed upon by the account holder. A licensee shall use all commercially and technologically reasonable means to independently verify the identity of the bettor making a deposit or withdrawal.

If a licensee determines that the information provided by a bettor to make a deposit or process a withdrawal is inaccurate or incapable of verification, or violates the policies and procedures of the licensee, the licensee shall, within ten (10) days, require the submission of additional information that can be used to verify the identity of the bettor.

If such information is not provided or does not result in verification of the bettor's identity, the licensee shall:

Immediately suspend the bettor's account and not allow the bettor to place wagers;

Retain any winnings attributable to the bettor;

Refund the balance of deposits made to the account to the source of such deposit or by issuance of a check; and

Deactivate the account.

A licensee shall utilize geo-location or geo-fencing technology to ensure that interactive sports wagering is only available to bettors who are physically located in this state. A licensee shall maintain in this state its servers used to transmit information for purposes of accepting or paying out bets or wagers on a sporting event placed by bettors located in this state.

A licensee shall clearly and conspicuously display on the website page a statement indicating that it is illegal for a person under twenty-one (21) years of age to engage in sports wagering in this state.

The board shall promulgate rules for purposes of regulating sports wagering via interactive sports wagering.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-326. Violations of part — Hearings — Administrative fines.

The board may investigate and conduct a hearing with respect to a licensee upon information and belief that the licensee has violated this part, or upon the receipt of a credible complaint from any person that a licensee has violated this part. The board shall conduct investigations and hearings in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

If the board determines that a licensee has violated any provision of this part or rule of the board, the board may:

Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; and

For any violation by a licensee, impose an administrative fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation.

Except as provided in § 4-51-327, the board shall promulgate rules establishing a schedule of administrative fines that may be assessed in accordance with subsection (b) for each violation of this part.

Fines assessed under this section must be accounted for separately for use by the board in a manner consistent with rules of the board.

The board may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books, accounts, records, and documents for purposes of carrying out its duties under this part.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-327. Investigations by board.

The board, utilizing security personnel of the corporation, shall conduct investigations to determine whether:

A licensee is accepting wagers from minors or other persons ineligible to place wagers in this state; and

A person is unlawfully accepting wagers from another person without a license or at a location in violation of this part.

After a hearing under § 4-51-326, if the board finds that:

A licensee is accepting wagers from minors or other persons ineligible to place wagers in this state, the board shall impose a fine against the licensee in the following amount:

For a first offense, one thousand dollars ($1,000);

For a second offense, two thousand dollars ($2,000); and

For a third or subsequent offense, five thousand dollars ($5,000); and

A person is unlawfully accepting wagers from another person without a license, the board shall impose a fine against the person in the following amount:

For a first offense, ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

For a second offense, fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000); and

For a third or subsequent offense, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

This section does not prohibit the board from suspending, revoking, or refusing to renew the license of a licensee in accordance with § 4-51-326.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-328. Appealing final actions of the board.

A licensee or other person aggrieved by a final action of the board may appeal that decision to the chancery court of Davidson County.

The chancery court of Davidson County shall hear appeals from decisions of the board and, based upon the record of the proceedings before the board, may reverse the decision of the board only if the appellant proves the decision to be:

Clearly erroneous;

Arbitrary and capricious;

Procured by fraud;

A result of substantial misconduct by the board; or

Contrary to the United States Constitution, the Constitution of Tennessee, or this part.

The chancery court may remand an appeal to the board to conduct further hearings.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-329. Civil penalties.

A licensee or other person who violates this part is liable for a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for violations arising out of the same transaction or occurrence, which must accrue to the corporation and may be recovered in a civil action brought by the office of the attorney general and reporter or its designee in the name of the corporation.

The office of the attorney general may seek and obtain an injunction in a court of competent jurisdiction for purposes of enforcing this part.

Costs must not be taxed against the office of the attorney general and reporter or this state for actions brought under this section.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-330. Transmission of sports information for purposes of sports wagering.

It is unlawful for any person or entity, directly or indirectly, to knowingly receive, supply, broadcast, display, or otherwise transmit material nonpublic information for the purpose of wagering on a sporting event or influencing another person's or entity's wager on a sporting event.

This section does not apply to the dissemination of public information as news, entertainment, or advertising.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

As used in this section, “material nonpublic information” means information that has not been disseminated publicly concerning an athlete, contestant, prospective contestant, or athletic team, including, without limitation, confidential information related to medical conditions or treatment, physical or mental health or conditioning, physical therapy or recovery, discipline, sanctions, academic status, education records, eligibility, playbooks, signals, schemes, techniques, game plans, practices, strategies, assessments, systems, drills, or recordings of practices or other athletic activities.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.